Hawaii statutes.
[PART
IIA.] CHILD ABUSE AND NEGLECT PREVENTION

Cross References

Safe place for newborns, see chapter 587D.

Shaken baby syndrome (prevention), see §321-33.

[§321-36] Definitions. For the
purposes of this part:

"Child screening for early identification
and remediation of social and health problems" means routine follow up and
progress checks for toddlers and preschoolers which include the location and
support of isolated parents in need of assistance.

"Department" means the department of
health.

"Education for parenthood" means
programs to educate all levels of youths as to the needs and appropriate
expectations for the different levels of infancy and childhood.

"Home visitor programs" mean services
utilizing paraprofessionals or community volunteers for supportive intervention
services to parents from the prenatal through infancy periods.

"Infants in need of extra services"
include infants who are ill or handicapped or the result of a multiple birth.

"Mutual aid programs" mean
peer-support groups for target populations.

"Perinatal bonding" means the process
of attachment between parents and newborns around the circumstance of birth.

"Secondary prevention programs" mean
programs directed at recognizing, assessing, and achieving change in high risk
situations so that abuse and neglect do not occur. [L 1984, c 212, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next